src/fst/affixes/numerals.lexc
! ================================ !
!! !!!Numeral morphological lexica 
! ================================ !

LEXICON NUM_
CARD ;

LEXICON NUM-CARD_
CARD ;

LEXICON NUM-DIST_
+Distr: K ;

!This has to be worked on 2012-01-19
LEXICON QNT-CARD_
 CARD ;
:%>ӧд ORD ;
:%>нан COLL ;

LEXICON CARD
+Card: NumCASEPOSSLEX ;
+Card+Der/кӧ+Presentational:%>%-кӧ WordEnd ;
!+Ord:%>ӧд NumCASEPOSSLEX ;
+Card+Iter:%>%{иі%}сь K ;
+Card+Iter+Distr:%>%{иі%}сьӧн K ;
+Card+Distr:%>ӧн K ;

LEXICON COLL
+Coll: NumCASEPOSSLEX ; ! _нан_ is already part of the stem
+Coll+Iter:%>%{иі%}сь K ;
+Coll+Iter+Distr:%>%{иі%}сьӧн K ;

LEXICON ORD
+Ord: NumCASEPOSSLEX ; ! ӧд part of the stem
+Ord+Iter:%>%{иі%}сь K ;
+Ord+Iter+Distr:%>%{иі%}сьӧн K ;!CHECKME 2019-11-04

LEXICON NUM-IS_DISTR
+Distr: K ;

LEXICON QNT_
: NumCASEPOSSLEX ;
+Card+Iter:%>%{иі%}сь K ;
+Card+Iter+Distr:%>%{иі%}сьӧн K ;
+Card+Distr:%>ӧн K ;

LEXICON ITER_
+Iter: K ;

!! LEXICON NUM-APPR ! 2011-11-03 This will need work
LEXICON CARD-APPR
+Card+Appr: K ;

LEXICON CARD-ITER-APPR
+Card+Iter+Appr: K ;


! =================== !
!! !!Inflectional lexica 
! =================== !

!! All nouns follow one contlex "Noun1"
!! to begin with here is simply a list of all variant
!! with no more variants beyond:

! Numbers
! Case + Px or Px+Case


LEXICON NumCASEPOSSLEX
+Cmpl: # ;
+Der/MWN+N+Sg: NumMWN ;
+Der/MWN+N+Pl:%>ъяс NumMWN ;

LEXICON NumMWN
+Nom: K ;
!+ZeroAcc: K ; !This needs something done to it. There should be a TAG distinction
          !between +Acc: and +Acc:%>ӧс
          ! Introducing +ZeroAcc
+Acc:%>ӧс K ;
+Gen:%>лӧн K ;
+Abl:%>лысь K ;
DAT_THEN-K ;
+Acc+PxSg3:%>сӧ K ;
+Ins:%>ӧн K ;
+Com:%>кӧд K ;
+Car:%>тӧг K ;
+Cns:%>ла K ;
+Cmpr:%>ся K ;
+Ine:%>ын K ;
+Ela:%>ысь K ;
+Ill:%>ӧ K ;
+Apr:%>лань K ;
+Egr:%>сянь K ;
+Prl:%>ӧд K ;
!+Prl+Tra:%>ӧдті K ;
+TerI:%>ӧдз K ;
+TerII:%>ви K ;
!149

!1SG
+Nom+PxSg1:%>ӧй K ;
+Gen+PxSg1+So/PC:%>ӧйлӧн K ;
+Abl+PxSg1+So/PC:%>ӧйлісь K ;
+Dat+PxSg1+So/PC:%>ӧйлӧ K ;
+Acc+PxSg1:%>ӧс K ; !Zero marking on the possessive suffix, as it were.

+Ins+PxSg1+So/CP:%>нам K ;

+Com+PxSg1+So/PC:%>ӧйкӧд K ;
+Car+PxSg1+So/PC:%>ӧйтӧг K ;
+Cns+PxSg1+So/PC:%>ӧйла K ;

+Ine+PxSg1+So/CP:%>ам K ;
+Ela+PxSg1+So/CP:%>сьым K ;
+Ill+PxSg1+So/CP:%>ам K ;

+Apr+PxSg1+So/PC:%>ӧйлань K ;
+Egr+PxSg1+So/PC:%>ӧйсянь K ;

+Prl+PxSg1+So/CP:%>ӧдым K ;
+TerI+PxSg1+So/CP:%>ӧдзым K ; !CHECKME 2019-11-04

!2SG
+Nom+PxSg2:%>ыт K ;
+Gen+PxSg2+So/PC:%>ытлӧн K ;
+Abl+PxSg2+So/PC:%>ытлісь K ;
+Dat+PxSg2+So/PC:%>ытлӧ K ;
+Acc+PxSg2:%>тӧ K ;

+Ins+PxSg2+So/CP:%>нат K ;

+Com+PxSg2+So/PC:%>ыткӧд K ;

+Car+PxSg2+So/PC:%>ыттӧг K ;

+Cns+PxSg2+So/PC:%>ыдла K ;

+Ine+PxSg2+So/CP:%>ат K ;
+Ela+PxSg2+So/CP:%>сьыт K ;
+Ill+PxSg2+So/CP:%>ат K ;
+Apr+PxSg2+So/PC:%>ытлань K ;
+Egr+PxSg2+So/PC:%>ытсянь K ;
+Prl+PxSg2+So/CP:%>ӧдыт K ;
+TerI+PxSg2+So/CP:%>ӧдзыт K ;


!3SG
+Nom+PxSg3:%>ыс K ;
+Gen+PxSg3+So/PC:%>ыслӧн K ;
+Abl+PxSg3+So/PC:%>ыслісь K ;
+Dat+PxSg3+So/PC:%>ыслӧ K ;
+Acc+PxSg3:%>сӧ K ;

+Ins+PxSg3+So/CP:%>нас K ;

+Com+PxSg3+So/PC:%>ыскӧд K ;

+Car+PxSg3+So/PC:%>ыстӧг K ;
+Car+PxSg3+So/CP:%>тӧгыс K ;

+Cns+PxSg3+So/PC:%>ысла K ;

+Ine+PxSg3+So/CP:%>ас K ;
+Ela+PxSg3+So/CP:%>сьыс K ;
+Ill+PxSg3+So/CP:%>ас K ;
+Apr+PxSg3+So/PC:%>ыслань K ;
+Egr+PxSg3+So/PC:%>ыссянь K ;
+Prl+PxSg3+So/CP:%>ӧдыс K ;
+TerI+PxSg3+So/CP:%>ӧдзыс K ;


!1PL
+Nom+PxPl1:%>ным K ;
+Gen+PxPl1+So/PC:%>нымлӧн K ;
+Abl+PxPl1+So/PC:%>нымлісь K ;
+Dat+PxPl1+So/PC:%>нымлӧ K ;
+Acc+PxPl1:%>нымӧс K ;

+Ins+PxPl1+So/CP:%>наным K ;

+Com+PxPl1+So/PC:%>нымкӧд K ;

+Car+PxPl1+So/PC:%>нымтӧг K ;

+Cns+PxPl1+So/PC:%>нымла K ;

+Ine+PxPl1+So/CP:%>аным K ;
+Ela+PxPl1+So/CP:%>сьыным K ;
+Ill+PxPl1+So/CP:%>аным K ;
+Apr+PxPl1+So/PC:%>нымлань K ;
+Egr+PxPl1+So/PC:%>нымсянь K ;
+Prl+PxPl1+So/CP:%>ӧдным K ;
+TerI+PxPl1+So/CP:%>ӧдзным K ;

!2PL
+Nom+PxPl2:%>ныт K ;
+Gen+PxPl2+So/PC:%>ныдлӧн K ;
+Abl+PxPl2+So/PC:%>ныдлісь K ;
+Dat+PxPl2+So/PC:%>ныдлӧ K ;
+Acc+PxPl2:%>нытӧ K ;

+Ins+PxPl2+So/CP:%>наныт K ;

+Com+PxPl2+So/PC:%>ныткӧд K ;

+Car+PxPl2+So/PC:%>ныттӧг K ;

+Cns+PxPl2+So/PC:%>нытла K ;

+Ine+PxPl2+So/CP:%>аныт K ;
+Ela+PxPl2+So/CP:%>сьыныт K ;
+Ill+PxPl2+So/CP:%>аныт K ;
+Apr+PxPl2+So/PC:%>нытлань K ;
+Egr+PxPl2+So/PC:%>нытсянь K ;
+Prl+PxPl2+So/CP:%>ӧдныт K ;
+Ter+PxPl2+So/CP:%>ӧдзныт K ;


!3PL
+Nom+PxPl3:%>ныс K ;
+Gen+PxPl3+So/PC:%>ныслӧн K ;
+Abl+PxPl3+So/PC:%>ныслісь K ;
+Dat+PxPl3+So/PC:%>ныслӧ K ;
+Acc+PxPl3:%>нысӧ K ;

!+Ins+PxPl3+So/CP:%>наныс K ; ! ста
!+Nom+PxPl3+So/CP:%>нанныс K ; ! 2012-02-16 this should be removed

+Com+PxPl3+So/PC:%>ныскӧд K ;

+Car+PxPl3+So/PC:%>ныстӧг K ;

+Cns+PxPl3+So/PC:%>нысла K ;

+Ine+PxPl3+So/CP:%>аныс K ;
+Ela+PxPl3+So/CP:%>сьыныс K ;
+Ill+PxPl3+So/CP:%>аныс K ;
+Apr+PxPl3+So/PC:%>ныслань K ;
+Egr+PxPl3+So/PC:%>ныссянь K ;
+Prl+PxPl3+So/CP:%>ӧдныс K ;
+TerI+PxPl3+So/CP:%>ӧдзныс K ;



                     
 
!! !!Arabic numerals
! ===============

!LEXICON NUM-PREFIXES     !!= * __@CODE@__  
!        ARABIC ;
!§       ARABIC ;      ! §24                     !^C^                               
!§§      ARABIC ;     ! §§24                     !^C^                               
!§%      ARABIC ;    ! § 24                      !^C^                               
!§§%     ARABIC ;   ! §§ 24                      !^C^                               
!%-      ARABIC ;     ! -24                      !^C^                               
!%‒      ARABIC ;     ! -24 U+2012 Figure line   !^C^                               
!%–      ARABIC ;     ! -24 U+2013 en dash       !^C^                               
!%—      ARABIC ;     ! -24 U+2014 em dash       !^C^                               
!%―      ARABIC ;     ! -24 U+2015 horizontal l  !^C^                               
!%+      ARABIC ;     ! +24                      !^C^                               
!%-%     ARABIC ;        ! - 24                  !^C^                               
!%‒%     ARABIC ;        ! - 24 2012             !^C^                               
!%–%     ARABIC ;        ! - 24 2013             !^C^                               
!%—%     ARABIC ;        ! - 24 2014             !^C^                               
!%―%     ARABIC ;        ! - 24 2015             !^C^                               
!%+%     ARABIC ;        ! + 24                  !^C^                               
!%*      ARABIC ;     ! *24                      !^C^                               
!%$      ARABIC ;     ! $24  ! And the Euro?     !^C^                               
!%<      ARABIC ;     ! <24                      !^C^                               
!!%>     ARABIC ;     ! >24                      !^C^                               
!s%.     ARABIC ;     ! s.24                     !^C^                               
!


LEXICON ARABIC          !!= * __@CODE@__ 
1 ARABICLOOP ;                                  !^C^                               
2 ARABICLOOP ;                                  !^C^                               
3 ARABICLOOP ;                                  !^C^                               
4 ARABICLOOP ;                                  !^C^                               
5 ARABICLOOP ;                                  !^C^                               
6 ARABICLOOP ;                                  !^C^                               
7 ARABICLOOP ;                                  !^C^                               
8 ARABICLOOP ;                                  !^C^                               
9 ARABICLOOP ;                                  !^C^                               
%0 ARABICLOOP ;                                 !^C^                               



LEXICON ARABICLOOP                              !^C^                                                                              
+Num+Card: NUMDELIMITER ;
        ARABIC ;                                !^C^                                                                              
%-      ARABIC ;              ! 1-2    multipart numbers        !^C^                                                              
%.%-    ARABIC ;              ! 1.-2   multipart numbers        !^C^                                                              
%-%     ARABIC ;              ! 1- 2   multipart numbers        !^C^                                                              
% %-    ARABIC ;              ! 1 -2   multipart numbers        !^C^                                                              
% %-%   ARABIC ;              ! 1 - 2  multipart numbers        !^C^                                                              
% %-%-%   ARABIC ;            ! 1 -- 2 multipart numbers        !^C^                                                              
%. ARABIC ;                                                     !^C^                                                              
%, ARABIC ;                                                     !^C^                                                              
%: ARABIC ;                                                     !^C^                                                              
%  ARABIC ;   ! Allowing for "23 500".                     !^C^                                                              
   ARABIC ;   ! Allowing for "23 500" w/nbsp (initial char = alt-space) !^C^                                              
%/ ARABIC ;   ! 24/12                                      !^C^                                                              
+A+Ord:%. # ;                                                    !^C^                                                             
%-+Num:%- # ;         ! 10-  (high on missing list)                            !^C^                                                             
,%-+Num:,%- # ;       ! 10,-                                   !^C^                                                             
%%+Num+Nom:%% # ;     ! 50%. It is wrong, but 75 % of us write "75%".    !^C^                                              
% %%+Num+Nom:% %% # ; ! We must analyse the corr. ones too... 50 % etc. !^C^                                              

LEXICON NUMDELIMITER
    NumCASEPOSSLEX ;
:%: NumCASEPOSSLEX ;
:%- NumCASEPOSSLEX ;
:%' NumCASEPOSSLEX ;



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
